Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-217
New county; records; duty of clerk; evidentiary effect.

The clerk shall note at the end of each paper he shall transcribe the book and page from which the same was transcribed, and shall make a correct double index of the records; and on the completion of his duties he shall return the books to the county clerk of the county or counties from which the new county was formed, with his certificate attached thereto, showing that he has complied with the law; whereupon they shall be taken and considered to all intents and purposes as books of records of deeds, mortgages, and title papers for the new county. Copies of the record, certified by the officer having the custody of the same, shall be evidence in all courts and places, in the same manner that copies of records are evidence in other cases, and with like effect.

Laws 1879, § 18, p. 359;

R.S.1913, § 928;

C.S.1922, § 834;

C.S.1929, § 25-217;

R.S.1943, § 22-217.